Maryland, session 2025, HB1472.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–1016.
In this Part II of this subtitle, “Commission” means the Commission on Artistic
Property.
9–1021.
(a) (1) The Commission is the official custodian of all valuable paintings and
other objects of decorative art owned by or loaned to the State, except those located in a
State room of the Government House. With respect to the objects subject to its official
custody, the Commission shall:
(i) keep a continuing inventory of the objects; and

HOUSE BILL 1472 3
(ii) be responsible for and supervise the acquisition, custody, display,
location, preservation, proper care, security, and restoration of the objects.
(2) At such time as the State acquires the Peabody Art Collection from the
Peabody Institute, the Commission shall become the official custodian of the Collection.
(3) In exercising its custodial responsibilities, the Commission may loan
objects owned by the State to qualified institutions and may contract with such institutions
for the performance of curatorial services.
(b) (1) Each person or agency that desires to acquire a painting or object of
decorative art for display in or on the premises of any State building, except in a room of
the Government House, must receive both prior approval and final acceptance from the
Commission.
(2) Before giving prior approval or final acceptance in accordance with this
subsection, the Commission shall consider:
(i) the competence of the artist;
(ii) the proposed location of the object; and
(iii) the quality, historical significance, and appropriateness of the
work.
(c) This subtitle does not apply to artwork acquired through the Maryland Public
Art Initiative Program established under Title 4, Subtitle 6 of the Economic Development
Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) A suitable monument of the Ten Commandments shall be placed on the
grounds of the Maryland State House.
(2) The monument shall contain the following text:
“The Ten Commandments
I AM the LORD thy God.
Thou shalt have no other gods before me.
Thou shalt not make to thyself any graven images.
Thou shalt not take the Name of the Lord thy God in vain.
Remember the Sabbath day, to keep it holy.
Honor thy father and thy mother, that thy days may be long upon the land which the
Lord thy God giveth thee.
Thou shalt not kill.
Thou shalt not commit adultery.
Thou shalt not steal.

HOUSE BILL 1472
Thou shalt not bear false witness against thy neighbor.
Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor’s house.
Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor’s wife, nor anything that is thy neighbor’s.”.
(b) The Commission on Artistic Property shall oversee the care and maintenance
of the monument of the Ten Commandments after the monument is placed on the grounds
of the Maryland State House.
(c) This section may be cited as the Ten Commandments Monument Display Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) There is a Commission on the Ten Commandments Monument.
(b) (1) The Commission consists of the following members:
(i) two members appointed by the President of the Senate;
(ii) two members appointed by the Speaker of the House; and
(iii) three members appointed by the Governor.
(2) Individuals appointed to the Commission under paragraph (1) of this
subsection must have training, expertise, or special interests that will benefit the purposes
of the Commission.
(c) The Governor shall designate the chair of the Commission.
(d) The Division of Historical and Cultural Programs in the Department of
Planning shall provide staff for the Commission in consultation with other appropriate
agencies, including the State House Trust, the Maryland State Arts Council, and the
Department of General Services.
(e) A member of the Commission:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Commission; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Commission shall:
(1) as soon as practicable, but not later than December 31, 2025, develop
and implement a process for the design, construction, and placement of a monument of the
Ten Commandments on the grounds of the Maryland State House by a private entity at no
cost to the State;

HOUSE BILL 1472 5
(2) advise the Governor, the General Assembly, and State agencies on
matters relating to the monument;
(3) perform other duties necessary to approve the design and site selection
for the monument, including arranging for placement of the monument in a location where
there are no other monuments; and
(4) complete all of its duties by June 30, 2027.
(g) In the event that the legality or constitutionality of the monument under this
section is challenged in a court of law, the Attorney General may:
(1) prepare and present a legal defense of the monument; or
(2) request the assistance of a nonprofit legal organization that specializes
in First Amendment cases to prepare and present a legal defense of the monument.
(h) The placement of the monument may not be construed to mean that the State
favors any particular religion or denomination over others.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. Section 3 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of
June 30, 2028, Section 3 of this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.